California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) The provider card issuer selected by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall, at no cost to the provider, do all the following:

(A) Disclose in writing, or electronically via email, to each provider choosing to use one, the entire terms
 and conditions of the provider card. The provider shall select the method of disclosure at the time the provider enrolls for payment of wages by provider card.

(B) Provide the ability to withdraw the entire amount of wages for each pay period at an automated teller machine at any financial institution or at any financial institution that is in the provider card issuer’s network. This does not preclude additional methods by which a provider can access wages deposited on the provider card.

(C) An annual notice, sent either by mail or electronically, at the choice of the provider, informing the provider of the right to request periodic statements, 12-month transaction histories, and the balance of available funds.

(f) This section does not inhibit the ability of a recognized labor organization representing providers
 from offering a particular provider card to the providers represented by that organization.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Issuer” means a provider card issuer, and includes a person acting as an agent of an issuer, directly or indirectly.

(2) “Provider card” means an access
 mechanism, including a prepaid account or prepaid card, as those terms are defined under the EFTA or other rules subsequently adopted under the EFTA, a code, or another device, through which the provider can access the provider’s wages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 278.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.41.

If a natural disaster has resulted in a declared state of emergency, affected counties shall use a void and reissue warrant process for any provider who lost or had damaged an uncashed warrant because of the natural disaster. When reissuing the uncashed warrant, a county shall verify the provider’s current mailing address and update the mailing address in the Case Management Information and Payroll System to ensure that the reissued warrant will be mailed to the provider’s current address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 789, Sec. 5.   (SB 1040)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.5.

Any aged, blind, or disabled individual who would be eligible for assistance under this chapter or under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), except for his excess income, is eligible to receive a payment under this article to purchase in-home supportive services if his income is insufficient to provide for the cost of such care, and he is otherwise qualified under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.6.

The county welfare department shall provide to each visually impaired applicant or recipient of benefits under this article, upon determination or redetermination of eligibility for benefits under this article, information on, and referral services to, community public and nonprofit entities that provide reading services to visually impaired persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.7.

Between January 1 and April 15 of each year, the Controller shall include a notice on, and insert an informational flyer which shall be prepared by the department, with, all payroll warrants issued to providers of services under this chapter informing those providers that they may qualify for the federal earned income tax credit, as provided for in Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

Any aged, blind, or disabled individual who would be eligible for assistance under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), except for his excess income, and who receives services under this article, shall be eligible for Medi-Cal benefits as a categorically needy recipient under Section 14005.1, provided that his nonexempt income in excess of the sum in the applicable subdivision of Section 12200 is used toward the purchase of such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.1.

(a) (1) Any aged, blind, or disabled individual who received Medi-Cal personal care services pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 14132.95 before July 1, 2009, and who continues to receive those services, and who would otherwise be deemed a categorically needy recipient pursuant to Section 12305, is eligible to receive a supplementary payment under this article to be used towards the purchase of
 personal care services. Additionally, any aged, blind, or disabled individual who received services pursuant to Section 14132.951 before July 1, 2009, and who continues to receive those services, and who would otherwise be deemed a categorically needy recipient pursuant to Section 12305 is eligible to receive a supplementary payment under this article to be used towards the purchase of services under Section 14132.951. Supplementary payments shall be available only to those individuals who meet the criteria set forth in this subdivision, and were eligible to receive a supplementary payment as of June 30, 2009.

(2) An individual who meets the above criteria for supplementary payments shall have his or her supplementary payment eliminated as of October 1, 2009.

(b) A supplementary payment pursuant to this section shall be the difference between the following amounts:

(1) A beneficiary’s excess income as determined under Section 12304.5.

(2) The beneficiary’s nonexempt income as determined pursuant to Section 14005.7, in excess of the income levels for maintenance need pursuant to Section 14005.12.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no supplementary payment shall be made pursuant to this section unless the amount specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is larger than the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) In the event of a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the Administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that supplemental payments to medically needy persons not receiving services pursuant to
 subdivision (p) of Section 14132.95 or Section 14132.951 must be made, then this section and subdivision (p) of Section 14132.95 shall cease to be operative on the first day of the month that begins after the expiration of a period of 30 days subsequent to a notification in writing by the Director of Finance to the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 26.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Section conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

12305.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person who:

(1) Was once determined to be disabled in accordance with Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Section 1382c, Title 42, United States Code), and

(2) Became ineligible for benefits under this chapter because the person engaged in substantial gainful activity, and

(3) Continues to suffer from the physical or mental impairments which were the basis of the disability
 determination required under paragraph (1), and

(4) Requires in-home supportive care to carry out any or all of the following: 

(A) Routine bodily functions, such as bowel or bladder care.

(B) Dressing.

(C) Preparation and consumption of food.

(D) Moving into and out of bed.

(E) Routine bed bath.

(F) Ambulation.

(G) Any other function of daily living as determined by the director;
shall be considered to be disabled, for the purposes of this article only, even though such person is engaged in
 substantial gainful activity. Regardless of whether such person has excess income, such person shall be eligible to receive payment under this article to purchase in-home supportive services if his income is insufficient to provide for the cost of such care, and he is otherwise qualified under this article.

(b) For purposes of this section, “substantial gainful activity” means work activity considered to be substantial gainful activity under applicable federal regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(c) The determination of continued impairments and the need for in-home supportive care shall be supported by medical reports when requested. Such reports shall be provided at the expense of the department.

(d) This section shall not be construed as creating any
 entitlement to state supplementation pursuant to Section 12150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1362.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person specified in subdivision (b) shall be eligible for in-home supportive services under this chapter.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to any person who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) He or she is not eligible for benefits under this chapter because of the provisions of federal Public Law 104-193 affecting eligibility under Title XVI of the Social
 Security Act.

(2) He or she would be eligible for benefits under this chapter but for the provisions of federal Public Law 104-193 affecting eligibility under Title XVI of the Social Security Act. Eligibility under this chapter shall include the same deeming provisions pursuant to Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42, United States Code).

(3) He or she continues to meet all other applicable eligibility criteria for receiving benefits under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 28.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.7.

The department shall perform all of the following activities:

(a) Beginning in the 2004–05 fiscal year, and in each subsequent fiscal year, the department in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and the county welfare departments shall design and conduct an error rate study to estimate the extent of payment and service authorization errors and fraud in the provision of supportive services. The error rate study findings shall be used to prioritize and direct state and county fraud detection and quality improvement efforts. The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide technical assistance and guidance for the error rate studies as requested by the department.

(b) (1) The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct automated data matches to compare Medi-Cal paid claims and third-party liability data with supportive services paid service hours data to identify potential overpayments, duplicate payments, alternative payment sources for supportive services, and other potential supportive services delivery discrepancies, including but not limited to, receipt of supportive services by a recipient on the same day that other potentially duplicative Medi-Cal services are received. Relevant data match findings shall be transmitted to the counties, or to the appropriate state entity, for action.

(2) The department, in consultation with the county welfare departments and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall determine, define, and issue instructions to the counties describing the roles and responsibilities of the department, the State Department of Health
 Care Services, and counties for resolving data match discrepancies requiring followup, defining the necessary actions that will be taken to resolve them, and the process for exchange of information pertaining to the findings and disposition of data match discrepancies.

(c) The department shall develop methods for verifying the receipt of supportive services by program recipients. In developing the specified methods the department shall obtain input from program stakeholders as provided in Section 12305.72. The department shall, in consultation with the county welfare departments, also determine, define, and issue instructions describing the roles and responsibilities of the department and the county welfare departments for evaluating and responding to identified problems and discrepancies.

(d) The department shall make available on its internet website the regulations, all-county letters, approved forms, and training curricula developed and officially issued by the department to implement the items described in Section 12305.72. The department shall inform supportive services providers, recipients, and the general public about the availability of these items and of the Medi-Cal toll-free fraud hotline and internet website for reporting suspected fraud or abuse in the provision or receipt of supportive services.

(e) (1) (A) The department, in consultation with counties and in accordance with Section 12305.72, shall develop a standardized curriculum, training materials, and work aids, and operate an ongoing, statewide training program on the supportive services uniformity system. The training shall address, at a minimum, statutes, regulations, and policies related to in-home supportive services and service assessment and authorization, including the functional index ranks and statewide hourly task guidelines.

(B) The department shall develop a one-day refresher training program on service assessment and authorization, including the functional index ranks and statewide hourly task guidelines.

(2) (A) In-Home Supportive Services program case workers, case worker supervisors, program managers, quality assurance staff, and program integrity staff hired after the effective date of the act that added this paragraph shall complete the training developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) within six months of being hired.

(B) In-Home Supportive Services program case workers, case worker supervisors, program managers, quality assurance staff, and program integrity staff hired prior to the effective date of the act that added this paragraph who have not taken the training developed pursuant to
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), or who took the training prior to July 1, 2019, shall take the refresher training program developed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) by December 31, 2021.

(C) State hearing officers and public authority or nonprofit consortium staff may, but are not required to, attend the training or refresher training developed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Training shall be scheduled and provided at sites throughout the state. The department may obtain a qualified vendor to assist in the development of the training and to conduct the training program. The design of the training program shall provide reasonable flexibility to allow counties to use their preferred training modalities to educate their supportive services staff in this subject matter.

(f) The department shall, in conjunction with the counties, develop protocols and procedures for monitoring county quality assurance programs. The monitoring may include onsite reviews of county quality assurance activities. The focus of the established monitoring protocols and procedures shall include determining the extent to which counties are fulfilling their quality assurance responsibilities and county quality assurance staff are correctly applying the uniformity system in reviewing supportive services cases for consistent, appropriate, and accurate service need assessments. The department and the county welfare departments shall also develop the protocols and procedures under which the department will report its monitoring findings to a county, disagreements over the findings are resolved, to the extent possible, and the county, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the department will follow up on the findings.

(g) The department shall conduct a review of program regulations in effect on the date of enactment of this section and shall revise the regulations as necessary to conform to the statutory changes that have occurred since the regulations were initially promulgated and to conform to federally authorized program changes.

(h) The department, in consultation with the county welfare departments and other stakeholders, as appropriate, shall develop protocols for the implementation of targeted mailings to providers, to convey program integrity concerns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 72.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.71.

(a) Counties shall perform the following quality assurance activities:

(1) Establish a dedicated, specialized unit or function to ensure quality assurance and program integrity, including fraud detection and prevention, in the provision of supportive services.

(2) Perform routine, scheduled reviews of supportive services cases, to ensure that caseworkers appropriately apply the supportive services uniformity system and other supportive services rules and policies for assessing recipients’ need for services to the end that there are accurate assessments of needs and hours. Counties may consult with state quality assurance staff for technical assistance and shall cooperate with state monitoring of the county’s quality assurance activities and findings.

(3) The department and the county welfare departments shall develop policies, procedures, implementation timelines, and instructions under which county quality assurance programs will perform the following activities:

(A) Receiving, resolving, and responding appropriately to claims data match discrepancies or other state level quality assurance and program integrity information that indicates potential overpayments to providers or recipients or third-party liability for supportive services.

(B) Implementing procedures to identify potential sources of third-party liability for supportive services.

(C) Monitoring the delivery of supportive services in the county to detect and prevent potential fraud by providers, recipients, and others and maximize the recovery of overpayments from providers or recipients.

(i) As appropriate, in targeted cases, to protect program integrity, this monitoring may include a visit to the recipient’s home to verify the receipt of services.

(ii) The exact date and time of a home visit shall not be announced to the supportive services recipient or provider.

(iii) The department, in consultation with the county welfare departments, shall develop protocols for followup home visits and other actions, if the provider and recipient are not at the recipient’s home at the time of the initial home visit. The protocols shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(I) Information sent to the recipient’s home regarding the goals of the home visit, including the county’s objective to maintain program integrity by verifying the receipt of services, the quality of services and consumer well-being, and the potential loss of services if fraud is substantiated.

(II) Additional attempted visits to the recipient’s home, pursuant to clause (i).

(III) Followup phone calls to both the recipient and the provider, if necessary.

(D) Informing supportive services providers and recipients, and the public that suspected fraud in the provision or receipt of supportive services can be reported by using the toll-free Medi-Cal fraud telephone hotline and internet website.

(E) In accordance with protocols developed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 12305.7, distribute targeted program integrity mailings to providers. The purpose of the targeted program integrity mailings is to inform providers of appropriate program rules and requirements and consequences for failure to adhere to them.

(4) Develop a schedule, beginning July 1, 2005, under which county quality assurance staff shall periodically perform targeted quality assurance studies.

(5) In accordance with protocols developed by the department and county welfare departments, conduct joint case review activities with state quality assurance staff, including random postpayment paid claim reviews to ensure that payments to providers were valid and were associated with existing program recipients; identify, refer to, and work with appropriate agencies in investigation, administrative action, or prosecution of instances of fraud in the provision of supportive services. The protocols shall consider the relative priorities of the activities required pursuant to this section and available resources.

(b) (1) Until December 31, 2020, a county may request, and the department may approve, a reduction of quality assurance and program integrity activities pursuant to this section and Section 12305.7 to address staffing shortages and enable the county to repurpose staff to support critical In-Home Supportive Services administrative functions, including intakes and reassessments. Any reduction pursuant to this subdivision shall be in effect for a period of no more than 12 months, to be determined by the department on a case-by-case basis.

(2) Until December 31, 2020, a county may perform required quality assurance and program integrity activities pursuant to this section and Section 12305.7 remotely using telehealth, including by video conference or telephone,
 subject to continuing federal approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 73.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.72.

The department shall convene periodic meetings in which supportive services recipients, providers, advocates, IHSS provider representatives, organizations representing recipients, counties, public authorities, nonprofit consortia, and other interested stakeholders may receive information and have the opportunity to provide input to the department regarding the quality assurance, program integrity, and program consistency efforts required by Sections 12305.7 and 12305.71. The program development activities that shall be covered in these meetings shall include, but
 are not limited to:

(a) Implementation of variable assessment intervals as provided in Section 12301.1.

(b) Development and implementation of statewide hourly supportive services task guidelines as provided in Section 12301.2.

(c) Development and implementation of a standardized medical certification form for protective supervision, as provided for in Section 12301.21.

(d) The development and implementation of statewide training for county staff, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 12305.7, on various subjects relating to the provision of supportive services including, but not limited to, the uniformity system, variable assessment intervals, statewide hourly task guidelines, and the standardized medical certification form for protective
 supervision services.

(e) The development and implementation of approaches to verifying receipt of program services by program recipients.

(f) Alternatives to requiring that a full reassessment be completed in order to authorize a temporary increase in supportive services hours following the discharge of a recipient from a medical facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 47.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.8.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this article:

(a) “Fraud” means the intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in some unauthorized benefit to himself or herself or some other person. Fraud also includes any act that constitutes fraud under applicable federal or state law.

(b) “Overpayment” means the amount paid by the department or the State Department
 of Health Services to a provider or recipient, which is in excess of the amount for services authorized or furnished pursuant to this article.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “health care benefits” includes supportive services, for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 550 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 48.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.81.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not be eligible to provide or receive payment for providing supportive services for 10 years following a conviction for, or incarceration following a conviction for, fraud against a government health care or supportive services program, including Medicare, Medicaid, or services provided under Title V, Title XX, or Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or Section 368 of the Penal Code, or similar violations in
 another jurisdiction. The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall develop a provider enrollment form that each person seeking to provide supportive services shall complete, sign under penalty of perjury, and submit to the county. Submission of the form shall include the photocopying by the county of original documentation verifying the provider’s identity, and shall be considered as an application to render services under the Medi-Cal program consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 14043.1. A provider shall submit the form to the county in person, and the county shall retain the form and a copy of the identification documentation in the file of the provider. The form shall contain statements to the following effect:

(1) A person who, in the last 10 years, has been convicted for, or incarcerated following conviction for, fraud against a government health care or supportive services program is not eligible to be
 enrolled as a provider or to receive payment for providing supportive services.

(2) An individual who, in the last 10 years, has been convicted for, or incarcerated following conviction for, a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 273a of the Penal Code or Section 368 of the Penal Code, or similar violations in another jurisdiction, is not eligible to be enrolled as a provider or to receive payment for providing supportive services.

(3) A statement declaring that the person has not, in the last 10 years, been convicted or incarcerated following conviction for a crime involving fraud against a government health care or supportive services program.

(4) A statement declaring that he or she has not, in the last 10 years, been convicted for, or incarcerated following conviction for, a violation of subdivision (a) of
 Section 273a of the Penal Code or Section 368 of the Penal Code, or similar violations in another jurisdiction.

(5) The person agrees to reimburse the state for any overpayment paid to the person as determined in accordance with Section 12305.83, and that the amount of any overpayment, individually or in the aggregate, may be deducted from any future warrant to that person for services provided to any recipient of supportive services, as authorized in Section 12305.83.

(b) The department shall include the text of subdivision (a) of Section 273a of the Penal Code and Section 368 of the Penal Code on the provider enrollment form.

(c) A public authority or nonprofit consortium that is notified by the department or the State Department of Health Care Services that a supportive services provider is ineligible to receive
 payments under this chapter or under Medi-Cal law shall exclude that provider from its registry.

(d) A public authority or nonprofit consortium that determines that a registry provider is not eligible to provide supportive services based on the requirements of subdivision (a) shall report that finding to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 27.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.82.

(a) In addition to its existing authority under the Medi-Cal program, the State Department of Health Care Services shall have the authority to investigate fraud in the provision or receipt of in-home supportive services. Counties shall also have the authority to investigate fraud in the provision or receipt of in-home supportive services pursuant to the protocols developed in subdivision (b). The
 department, the State Department of Health Care Services, and counties, including county quality assurance staff, shall work together as appropriate to coordinate activities to detect and prevent fraud by in-home supportive services providers and recipients in accordance with federal and state laws and regulations, including applicable due process requirements, to take appropriate administrative action relating to suspected fraud in the provision or receipt of in-home supportive services, and to refer suspected criminal offenses to appropriate law enforcement agencies for prosecution.

(b) (1) The department, in consultation with county welfare directors and other stakeholders, as appropriate, shall develop uniform statewide protocols for acceptable activities to be performed and acceptable measures to be taken by the department, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the counties for purposes of fraud
 prevention.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services, the department, and the county may share data with each other as necessary to prevent fraud and investigate suspected fraud pursuant to this section. The information shall only be used for purposes of preventing and investigating suspected fraud in the In-Home Supportive Services program, and shall otherwise remain confidential. 

(c) If the State Department of Health Care Services concludes that there is reliable evidence that a provider or recipient of supportive services has engaged in fraud in connection with the provision or receipt of in-home supportive services, the State Department of Health Care Services shall notify the department, the county, and the county’s public authority or nonprofit consortium, if any, of that conclusion.

(d) If a county
 concludes that there is reliable evidence that a supportive services provider or recipient has engaged in fraud in connection with the provision or receipt of in-home supportive services, the county shall notify the department and the State Department of Health Care Services of that conclusion. 

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county may investigate suspected fraud in connection with the provision or receipt of supportive services, with respect to an overpayment of five hundred dollars ($500) or less.

(f) The failure of a provider or a recipient to comply with program requirements may result in termination of his or her participation in the In-Home Supportive Services program, subject to all applicable federal and state due process requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 9.   (AB 19 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.83.

(a) When it has been determined that a provider of supportive services participating under this chapter has received an overpayment that is a debt due and owing, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 14043.1, the director or the county may, to the extent permissible under existing labor laws, recover the overpayment by offset against any amount currently due to a provider under the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) or by means of a repayment agreement
 executed between the provider and the director or the county, or by filing a civil action.

(b) The department, in consultation with the entities listed in Section 12305.72, shall identify, define, and develop policies, procedures, and applicable due process requirements under which overpayments to supportive services providers will be identified and recovered.

(c) If it is determined that an overpayment to a supportive services provider has occurred the county shall:

(1) Take all appropriate actions to recover the full amount of the overpayment by any combination of the following actions:

(A) Offsetting the overpayment from any future warrants to that provider for services provided to any recipient of services pursuant to subdivision (d).

(B) Entering into a negotiated repayment agreement.

(C) Filing a civil court action.

(2) If the overpayment was determined to have occurred as a result of fraud on the part of the supportive services provider, take all appropriate actions to suspend or exclude the provider as an enrolled provider and to prevent in the future any further payment of state or federal funds to the provider for up to 10 years following the conviction or the term of incarceration following the conviction for fraud.

(d) If the overpayment described in this section was determined to be the result of fraud, the full amount of the overpayment may be offset, in total, from any future warrants, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). If the overpayment is not determined to
 be the result of fraud the offset shall be limited to either of the following:

(1) The amounts provided for in a repayment agreement negotiated with the provider.

(2) No more than 5 percent of each warrant, for errors caused by the government and no more than 10 percent of each warrant, for errors resulting for any other reason, until the full or negotiated amount is recovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 51.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.84.

(a) Upon enactment of this section, the department shall convene a stakeholder group and begin a process with this group to develop and issue a report evaluating the implementation of the quality assurance and fraud prevention and detection activities enacted from 2004 to the present. The department shall include and collaborate with the State Department of Health Care Services, the California State Association of Counties, the County Welfare Directors Association, and stakeholders representing consumers and providers.

(b) The department shall provide this report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2010.

(c) The stakeholder group shall:

(1) Review the annual error reports issued and state-level quality assurance activities to date required by Section 12305.7 and review and evaluate the implementation of county quality assurance activities required by Section 12305.71, including a review of the number of instances, amounts, and causes of overpayments and underpayments identified by quality assurance activity at the state and county level from enactment to date.

(2) Review information available regarding prevention and early detection of fraud, the latter as defined by Section 12305.81.

(3) Collect
 and review information regarding referrals of suspected fraud to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 12305.82, and subsequent investigative efforts, including cost-benefit information regarding these efforts, as well as the number of fraud cases handled locally.

(4) Collect and review information regarding final convictions for fraud, including all of the following:

(A) The amount of funds involved in the conviction.

(B) The basis of the fraud conviction, including whether it involved services not provided or falsified consumers or providers, or both.

(C) Aggregate information regarding the number and source of individuals responsible, including, but not limited to, state employees, IHSS providers, consumers, county workers,
 or others.

(5) Provide recommendations on options for preventing errors and fraud for both the state and county levels, and recommendations for early detection strategies to combat fraud in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 28.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.86.

(a) Effective October 1, 2009, a county shall investigate the background of a person who seeks to become a supportive services provider and who is not listed on the registry of a public authority or nonprofit consortium pursuant to Section 12301.6. This investigation shall include criminal background checks conducted by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 15660.

(b) No later than July 1, 2010, the county shall complete a criminal background check pursuant to subdivision (a) for a provider who is providing in-home supportive services prior to October 1, 2009, and who is not listed on a public authority or nonprofit consortium registry, as a condition of the provider’s continued enrollment in the IHSS program. Criminal background checks shall be conducted at the provider’s expense.

(c) (1) Upon notice from the Department of Justice that a prospective or current provider has been convicted of a criminal offense specified in Section 12305.81, the county shall deny or terminate the applicant’s request to become a provider of supportive services to any recipient of the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(2) Commencing 90 days after the effective date of the
 act that adds Section 12305.87, and upon notice from the Department of Justice that an applicant who is subject to the provisions of that section has been convicted of, or incarcerated following conviction for, an offense described in subdivision (b) of that section, the county shall deny the applicant’s request to become a provider of supportive services to any recipient of in-home supportive services, subject to the individual waiver and exception processes described in that section. An applicant who is denied on the basis of Section 12305.87 shall be informed by the county of the individual waiver and exception processes described in that section.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the county shall provide an individual with a copy of his or her state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided to the county by the Department of Justice if the individual has been denied eligibility to provide supportive services to
 any recipient of the In-Home Supportive Services program based on this information. The copy of the state-level criminal offender record information search response shall be included with the individual’s notice of denial. Along with the notice of denial, the county shall also provide information in plain language on how an individual may contest the accuracy and completeness of, and refute any erroneous or inaccurate information in, his or her state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided by the Department of Justice as authorized by Section 11126 of the Penal Code. The state-level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(4) The department shall develop a written appeal process for the current and prospective providers who are determined ineligible to receive payment for the provision of services under